Washington statutes.
RCW 35.70.030

Convenience and necessity reported by superintendent.

If in the judgment of the officer or department having superintendence of streets and public places, public convenience or safety requires that a sidewalk be constructed along either side of any street, he or she shall report the fact to the city or town council immediately.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2119; 1965 c 7 s 35.70.030. Prior: 1915 c 149 s 2, part; RRS s 9156, part.]